Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0288.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a public body may meet in a closed session only for the following purposes: (a) To consider the dismissal, suspension, or disciplining of, or to hear complaints or charges brought against, or to consider a periodic personnel evaluation of, a public officer, employee, staff member, or individual agent, if the named individual requests a closed hearing. session. An individual requesting a closed hearing session may rescind the request at any time, in which case after which the matter at issue must be considered after the rescission only in open sessions. (b) To consider the dismissal, suspension, or disciplining of a student if the public body is part of the school district, intermediate school district, or institution of higher education that the student is attending, and if the student or the student's parent or guardian requests a closed hearing.session. (c) For strategy and negotiation sessions connected with the negotiation of a collective bargaining agreement if either negotiating party requests a closed hearing.session. (d) To consider the purchase or lease of real property up to the time an option to purchase or lease that real property is obtained. (e) To consult with its attorney regarding trial or settlement strategy in connection with specific pending either of the following: (i) Pending or notice of potential litigation , but only if an open meeting would have a detrimental financial effect on the litigating or settlement position of the public body.in which the public body or a member of the public body is a party or a potential party. (ii) The attorney's oral or written legal opinion. This subdivision does not prevent a public body from meeting in a closed session under subdivision (h), if applicable, to consider a written legal opinion from its attorney without its attorney being present. (f) To review and consider the contents of an application for employment or appointment to a public office if the candidate requests that the application remain confidential. However, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, all interviews by a public body for employment or appointment to a public office must be held in an open meeting pursuant to under this act. This subdivision does not apply to a public office described in subdivision (j). (g) Partisan caucuses of members of the state legislature. (h) To consider material exempt from discussion or disclosure by state or federal statute. (i) For a compliance conference conducted under section 16231 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16231, before a complaint is issued. (j) In the process of searching for and selecting a president of an institution of higher education established under section 4, 5, or 6 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963, to review the specific contents of an application, to conduct an interview with a candidate, or to discuss the specific qualifications of a candidate if the particular process of searching for and selecting a president of an institution of higher education meets all of the following requirements: (i) The search committee in the process, appointed by the governing board, consists of at least 1 student of the institution, 1 faculty member of the institution, 1 administrator of the institution, 1 alumnus of the institution, and 1 representative of the general public. The search committee also may include 1 or more members of the governing board of the institution, but the number does not constitute may not include a quorum of the governing board. However, the search committee must not be constituted in such a way that any 1 none of the groups described in this subparagraph constitutes may constitute a majority of the search committee. (ii) After the search committee recommends the 5 final candidates, the governing board does not take a vote on a final selection for the president until at least 30 days after the 5 final candidates have been publicly identified by the search committee publicly identifies those candidates. (iii) The deliberations and vote of the governing board of the institution on selecting the president take place in an open session of the governing board. (k) For a school board to consider security planning to address existing threats or prevent potential threats to the safety of the students and staff. As used in this subdivision, "school board" means any of the following: (i) That term as defined in section 3 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.3. (ii) An intermediate school board as that term is defined in section 4 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.4. (iii) A board of directors of a public school academy as described in section 502 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502. (iv) The local governing board of a public community or junior college as described in section 7 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963. (l) For a county veteran services committee to interview a veteran or a veteran's spouse or dependent regarding that individual's application for benefits or financial assistance and discuss that individual's application for benefits or financial assistance, if the applicant requests a closed hearing. session. This subdivision does not apply to a county veteran services committee voting on whether to grant or deny an individual's application for benefits or financial assistance. As used in this subdivision, "county veteran services committee" means a committee created by a county board of commissioners under section 1 of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.621, or a soldiers' relief commission created under section 2 of 1899 PA 214, MCL 35.22. (m) To consider a demand or offer made to or by the public body to settle a claim against the public body or a member of the public body. (n) To consider a lawsuit the public body is contemplating filing. (o) To consult regarding a criminal investigation against a member or an employee of the public body. (2) This act does not permit the independent citizens redistricting commission to meet in closed session for any purpose. As used in this subsection, "independent citizens redistricting commission" means the independent citizens redistricting commission for state legislative and congressional districts created in section 6 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963.